Missouri, session 2026, HB2302.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 217.443, to read as follows:
217.443. 1. When any inmate is discharged from a term of imprisonment for a
felony offense and the intended residence designated by the inmate is within this state,
the department of corrections shall provide the inmate with relevant documentation to
assist the inmate in obtaining post-release employment and shall coordinate with the
department of revenue to provide a state-issued identification card if the inmate does
not have a current state-issued identification card or driver's license.
2. Within nine months prior to the release of an inmate from custody, the
department of corrections, in coordination with the department of revenue, shall
identify whether the inmate has a current form of state-issued identification and if not,
begin the process of gathering the documentation required for the issuance of a state-
issued identification card pursuant to the process provided by state law.
3. The department of corrections shall coordinate with the department of
revenue to provide state-issued identification cards to all eligible inmates who do not
have a current state-issued identification card or driver's license upon their release from
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2302 2
custody. The identification cards shall be issued, replaced, cancelled, and denied in the
same manner as driver's licenses in this state.
4. The department of revenue shall allow the use of a certified copy of a birth
certificate coupled with a department of corrections-issued record card to serve as a
valid form of identification documentation to obtain a state-issued identification card.
5. State-issued identification cards issued with a record card from the
department of corrections for inmates shall be valid for a period of six years from
the month of issuance for an allowable fee to be determined by the department of
revenue and are nonrenewable and nontransferable.
6. The department of corrections may utilize any funds available to cover the
costs associated with the implementation and administration of this section and the
purchase of state-issued identification cards including, but not limited to, inmate trust
funds, existing funds of the department of corrections, and donations.
7. The provisions of this section shall apply only to inmates who may receive a
state-issued identification card pursuant to the standards established by state law.
8. For purposes of assisting an inmate in obtaining post-release employment, the
department of corrections shall provide the inmate with the following documentation:
(1) A copy of the vocational training record of the inmate, if applicable;
(2) A copy of the work record of the inmate, if applicable;
(3) A certified copy of the birth certificate of the inmate, if obtainable;
(4) A Social Security card or a replacement Social Security card of the inmate, if
obtainable;
(5) A resume that includes any trade learned by the inmate and the proficiency
at that trade by the inmate; and
(6) Documentation that the inmate has completed a practice job interview.
9. For purposes of assisting an inmate in obtaining post-release employment, the
department of corrections shall notify the inmate if he or she is eligible to apply for a
license from a state entity charged with oversight of an occupational license or
certification.
10. A delay in obtaining the documents listed under subsection 8 of this section
shall not be cause for a delay in an inmate's release through probation or parole from a
correctional center.
11. The following categories of inmates are not required to complete resumes or
practice job interviews prior to their release from incarceration:
(1) Inmates sixty-five years of age or older;
(2) Inmates releasing to medical parole or discharging from a prison infirmary
setting;

HB 2302 3
(3) Inmates releasing to the custody of another jurisdiction on a warrant or
detainer; and
(4) Inmates that the department determines would be physically or mentally
unable to enter the workforce upon release from incarceration.
12. The department of revenue and the department of corrections may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date,
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall
be invalid and void.
✔